Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.40
Molds, dies, and patterns; exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of molds, dies, and patterns which have been specifically designed and fabricated to the special order of the customer. This exemption shall not include machinery, equipment, or tools to which molds, dies, and patterns have been connected or attached in order to be used for their intended purpose. For purposes of this section, molds, dies, and patterns shall mean tools that are built specifically for manufacturing a single product, which product is either injection molded from plastic or stamped from metals.

Laws 1995, LB 430, § 1.